California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
Whenever in its opinion the public convenience and necessity require it for State highway purposes, the department may enter into a cooperative agreement:

(a) To construct a bridge across any river, stream, or inlet of the sea.

(b) To reconstruct or replace an existing, privately owned bridge over any river, stream or inlet of the sea, which bridge is used for highway purposes by the public and the owner.

(c) To acquire an existing bridge, or a right of way over the location of such
 bridge, whenever the acquisition of such bridge or right of way by the State alone would ordinarily require an excessive expenditure of State highway money.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

107.

Any such agreement may be:

(a) With any person for the construction of a new bridge and the use of any such bridge thereafter jointly by such person and the public.

(b) With the owner of any existing bridge for the reconstruction thereof, or for the replacement thereof by a new bridge, and the use of any such bridge thereafter jointly by such owner and the public.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

108.

Any agreement made under the authority of sections 106 and 107 may provide:

(a) Either for apportionment of the expense of any such construction, reconstruction, replacement, improvement, or maintenance between such owner or person and the State, or for the surrender to the State of the rights and property of the owner and the construction, reconstruction, replacement, improvement, or maintenance of any such bridge partly or wholly at the expense of the State.

(b) For the terms and conditions upon which the owner may use such bridge jointly with the
 public after the construction, reconstruction, replacement or improvement thereof.

(c) For other pertinent matters to give effect to sections 106 and 107.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

109.

Any such bridge acquired, constructed, reconstructed, replaced or improved in the manner provided in sections 106, 107 and 108 is a part of the State highway system and title thereto shall vest in the State. Any funds which, without such cooperative agreement, would be available for the construction, reconstruction, replacement, improvement or maintenance of a bridge at such location on the State highway system, shall be available for a similar use under such cooperative agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

109.5.

Whenever the construction of any facility of the United States or any department or agency thereof, or any feature thereof, requires construction or relocation of, or other change in any state highway or bridge, the department may enter into an agreement with the United States, or with the United States and any person, providing therefor, and for the exchange of any property required thereby. The department may enter into like agreements for acquisition of a right-of-way over, or respecting maintenance of, any facility, constructed or owned by the United States or any department or agency thereof, all or any portion of which is to be used for highway
 purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 648.)
-------------------------------------------

110.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit any county or city from contributing to the State, in the manner provided by law, funds or real property or interests therein for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, replacement, improvement or maintenance of any such bridge as is provided for by sections 106, 107 and 108, nor prohibit the relinquishment of any such bridge by the department to any county or city. Upon relinquishment such bridge shall be under the supervision and control of the county or city to which it is relinquished.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

111.

Whenever the natural course of a State highway passes into or through any city and a State highway route through or around such city is not specifically described by law, the commission shall determine the location of the connecting portion necessary to make the State highway continuous. Such location may be either through or around such city, depending upon the commission’s determination as to which location will be of the greatest benefit to through traffic upon such State highway.

Any portion of any street or highway, within the limits of such city, may be adopted by the commission as a part of the State highway system without
 compensation to the city.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

111.5.

Whenever a city street or a county highway and an existing state highway (1) are substantially parallel; (2) each has been or is to be restricted to one-way traffic, proceeding in opposite directions as to each other, by ordinance of such city or county duly enacted and applicable thereto; and (3) the commission determines that the existing state highway is inadequate and that state highway traffic conditions can be improved and state highway traffic more economically served than by confining improvements to the existing state highway, the commission may adopt any portion of the city street or county highway so
 substantially parallel with an existing state highway, as a part of the State Highway System without compensation to the city or county, and the department may improve the same and make necessary connections to route traffic one way on such city street or county highway and the existing state highway, respectively.

Whenever an ordinance of any city or county designating a particular highway as a one-way highway becomes applicable to a state highway, whether an existing state highway at the time of the enactment of such ordinance or a city street or county highway thereafter adopted as a state highway, such ordinance shall not be thereafter rescinded, repealed, revoked or amended by action of the legislative authority of such city or county without the consent in writing of the department with the approval of the commission first obtained, unless otherwise provided by the terms of any written agreement between the State and any city entered into prior to the
 effective date of this section. If any city street or county highway which has become a portion of the State Highway System pursuant to this section ceases to be a one-way street because the ordinance declaring such street or highway to be a one-way street or highway is rescinded, repealed, revoked, or amended, with the consent of the department, as hereinabove provided, such city street or county highway, or the portion thereof that is no longer restricted to one-way traffic, shall by operation of law revert to the status of a city street or county highway and cease to be a portion of the State Highway System.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1493.)
-------------------------------------------

112.

The department may enter into an agreement with any city relative to proceedings to be taken by the city to fix or change the grade of any State highway, or portion thereof, within the city in order to establish a grade specified in such agreement. The city, in fixing such grade, may follow the procedure specified in any statute or ordinance providing for fixing or changing the grades of city streets with like effect as if such highway were a city street and the grade so established or changed shall be the official grade of such State highway or portion thereof.

The city may contribute any part of the expense of such proceedings,
 including payment of claims, out of any funds available to it for the acquisition of rights of way for the construction, improvement or maintenance of streets.

This section does not limit the right of the department, on authorization of the commission, to proceed as provided in Article 1 of Chapter 6 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 901.)
-------------------------------------------

113.

Upon a request from the department the governing body of any city may acquire any real property or interest therein needed for state highway purposes and lying within such city. The title to such real property or interest therein may be taken in the name of the State or of the city.

Any city may aid in the construction, improvement or maintenance of any state highway located in whole or in part within its boundaries by contributing any part of the expense thereof to the department out of any city funds available or to become available for construction, improvement or maintenance of streets within the city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 902.)
-------------------------------------------

113.5.

A city or county may enter into a cooperative agreement with the department to fund the construction or improvement of a segment of a state highway located in whole or in part within its jurisdiction when the project is included in the state transportation improvement program pursuant to Section 14529 of the Government Code. The project shall be constructed by the department, and, upon completion of construction, the highway segment shall be in the possession and control of, and operated and maintained by, the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 106, Sec. 1.   Effective June 21, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

114.

(a) When the commission or other public entity has allocated any funds for the construction, improvement, or maintenance of any portion of a state highway within a city or a county, the department may enter into a cooperative agreement with the city or the county or other public entity for the performance of the work by the department or by the city or the county or other public entity, or for the apportionment of the expense of the work between the department and the city or the county or other public entity.

(b) The department shall enter into a cooperative agreement with
 a city, county, or other public entity to perform professional and technical project development services, if the department determines that the city, county, or other public entity in which the project is located has qualified and available staff to perform the necessary project services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1218, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

114.5.

The department shall not charge any self-help counties with countywide sales tax measures dedicated to transportation improvements more than 10 percent for administration indirect cost recovery. The department shall charge those self-help counties for functional overhead.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 54, Sec. 11.   (SB 125)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

115.

All work performed pursuant to any provisions of sections 111, 113 and 114 shall be performed to the satisfaction of and subject to the approval of the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

116.

The department may delegate to any such city or county any part of the powers and jurisdiction vested by law in the department, except the power of approval, with respect to any portion of any such state highway within such city or county, and may withdraw such delegation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 547.)
-------------------------------------------

117.

Unless otherwise specifically provided in the instrument conveying title, the acquisition, ownership, or control by the department of any right-of-way over any real property for state highway purposes includes the right of the department to issue, under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 660), permits for the location in the right-of-way of any structures or fixtures necessary to telegraph, telephone, advanced communication or information services, or electrical lines or of any ditches, pipes, drains, sewers, or underground structures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 71, Sec. 12.   (SB 198)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

118.

(a) If the department determines that real property or an interest therein, previously or hereafter acquired by the state for highway purposes, is no longer necessary for those purposes, the department may sell, contract to sell, sell by trust deed, or exchange the real property or interest therein in the manner and upon terms, standards, and conditions established by the commission. The payment period in a contract of sale or sale by trust deed shall not extend longer than 10 years from the time the contract of sale or trust deed is executed,
 and a transaction involving a contract of sale or sale by trust deed to private parties shall require a downpayment of at least 30 percent of the purchase price, except as follows:

(1) For improved and unimproved real property sold or exchanged for the purpose of housing for persons and families of low or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code, the payment period shall not exceed 40 years and the downpayment shall be at least 5 percent of the purchase price. All contracts of sale or sales by trust deed, for the purpose of housing for persons and families of low or moderate income shall bear interest. The rate of interest for the contract or sale shall be computed annually, and shall be the same as the average rate returned by the Pooled Money Investment Board for the past five fiscal years immediately preceding the year in which the payment is made. The contract of sale and sales by trust deeds shall not be
 utilized if the proposed development or sale qualifies for financing from other sources and if the financing makes feasible the provision of low- and moderate-income housing.

(2) Improved residential property sold to a local public agency pursuant to paragraph (1), if subsequently sold or transferred to a nonprofit housing organization, shall have the endorsement of the city in which the parcels are located, or the county if the parcels are located in an unincorporated area, that the housing shall remain at affordable housing costs to persons and families of low or moderate income and very low income households for the longest feasible time, but for not less than 15 years, as determined by the city or county, as applicable. By endorsing the sale, the city or county accepts the responsibility of ensuring the housing remains affordable. The local public agency shall record in the office of the county recorder covenants or restrictions
 implementing this subdivision. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the covenants or restrictions shall run with the land and shall be enforceable against the original purchaser from the department and successors in interest.

(b) A conveyance under this section shall be approved by the commission and shall be executed on behalf of the state by the director and the purchase price shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of any fund, available to the department for highway purposes, which the commission designates.

(c) Any such real property or interest therein may in like manner be exchanged, either as whole or part consideration, for any other real property or interest therein needed for state highway purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 208.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

118.1.

Except as provided in Article 8 (commencing with Section 54220) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code and Section 118. 6 of this code, with respect to commercial real property acquired for the construction of a state highway, but no longer required for that purpose because the construction will not be undertaken, the department shall first offer the real property for sale at its current fair market value to the occupant thereof if the occupant is renting or leasing the real property from the department, has used and occupied the real property, and has made improvements of a value in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) on
 the real property during that time at his or her own expense consistent with the terms of the rental or lease agreement with the department. For the purpose of establishing fair market value, the department shall obtain at least two independent appraisals from qualified appraisers.

The failure of the department to first offer excess real property as required by this section shall not affect the validity of any conveyance of this excess real property to any person or entity unaware of the failure of the department to do so. However, this shall in no way be construed as releasing the department from its responsibility in offering that property to the occupants thereof first.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 851, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

118.5.

No parcel of property acquired by eminent domain for the purposes specified in Section 104 which, in its entirety, is found to be no longer necessary for such purposes shall be subject to public sale, unless an amount equal to the taxes which would have been paid by the owner had the property not been acquired by the state is transmitted by the department to the county auditor of the county in which the property is located. The amount of any payments made pursuant to Section 104.10 with respect to the property shall be deducted from the amount required to be transmitted pursuant to this section.

The money received by the county under
 this section shall be expended only for the purposes authorized by Article XIX of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1060.)
-------------------------------------------

118.6.

The department shall, to the greatest extent possible, offer to sell or exchange excess real property within one year from the date that it is determined by the department to be excess.

“Excess real property,” for the purposes of this section, means all land and improvements situated outside of calculated highway right-of-way lines not needed or used for highway or other public purposes, including, but not limited to, those leased to public agencies pursuant to Section 104.15, and available for sale or exchange.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations to
 determine which real property outside of calculated right-of-way lines is no longer needed or used for highway or other public purposes, and which is available for sale or exchange. The department is authorized to lease all real property not presently needed or used for highway purposes pending the sale or exchange of such property.

Excess real property which consists of lands of notable environmental value, such as, but not limited to, lands of extraordinary scenic beauty, lands fronting on waterway, lakes, and marshes, lands within the boundaries of parks, recreational areas, wildlife preserves or refuges, and lands providing wildlife habitat shall first be offered for sale or exchange to public agencies operating parks and recreational areas as follows:

(a) To any park or recreation department of any city within which the land may be situated.

(b) To any park or recreation department of the county within which the land is situated.

(c) To any regional park authority having jurisdiction within the area in which the land is situated.

(d) To the State Resources Agency or any agency which may succeed to its powers.

The public agency desiring to purchase such land for park or recreation use shall notify the department within 60 days of its intent to purchase the land after receipt of the department’s notification of intent to sell the land. If the public agency desiring to purchase the land and the department are unable to arrive at a mutually satisfactory sales price for the land during the 60-day period, the land may be disposed of in the normal manner.

The failure of the department to first offer excess real property which
 consists of lands of notable environmental value to public agencies operating parks and recreational areas shall not affect the validity of any conveyance of such excess real property to any person or entity unaware of the failure of the department to do so; however, this shall in no way be construed as releasing the department from its responsibility in offering such property to such public agencies first.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 46.5.)
-------------------------------------------

118.7.

(a) The department may, upon terms, standards, and conditions approved by the commission and the California Coastal Commission, transfer environmental mitigation property located within the city limits of Huntington Beach to a public agency or to a nonprofit corporation that is qualified pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is organized for, among other things, open-space or land conservation purposes.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “environmental
 mitigation property,” means property owned by the department that is required by state or federal law, or by permit conditions imposed by a state or federal agency, to be preserved or restored as natural habitat to offset the environmental impacts caused by the construction and operation of a state highway improvement project. However, “environmental mitigation property” does not include property that is part of highway operating right of way. Environmental mitigation property shall be maintained as natural habitat in accordance with the permit conditions. “Environmental mitigation property” means property situated immediately east and adjacent to State Highway Route 1 located between Brookhurst Street and Newland Street with an approximate size of 7.1 acres.

(c) As a condition to the transfer of environmental mitigation property pursuant to subdivision (a), the department may enter into a cooperative agreement with the transferee to provide
 funding for the future maintenance of the property consistent with any permit conditions and mitigation requirements imposed by state or federal law or conditions imposed by a state or federal agency. In determining the amount of the funding provided, the department shall consider the costs of maintaining the property and shall offset from the amount of those costs any benefit or value received by the transferee as a result of the transfer.

The department shall provide the fiscal and transportation policy committees of the Legislature with at least 30 days prior written notice of the transfer and cooperative agreement, and the amount of any funding in accordance with the transfer and cooperative agreement, to facilitate the Legislature’s review of the transfer.

Funding provided as part of a transfer agreement shall be limited to a single occurrence.

(d) (1) The public agency or nonprofit corporation to which the department transfers the environmental mitigation property shall assume the long-term responsibility for the future maintenance of the property. 

(2) (A) If the public agency or nonprofit corporation fails to maintain the property in the manner required by law and in the manner described in subdivision (b), or if the nonprofit corporation ceases to exist, the property shall automatically revert to the department.

(B) If the property reverts back to the department pursuant to this paragraph, any remaining funds from the original transfer pursuant to subdivision (a) shall revert back to the department.

(C) Any costs, including legal costs, associated with reversion pursuant to this paragraph shall
 not accrue to the department.

(e) (1) All deeds conveying property in accordance with this section shall include a restriction limiting the use of the property solely for environmental mitigation purposes in accordance with the permit conditions specified in subdivision (b).

(2) All deeds conveying property in accordance with this section and deeds related to a transfer or assignment of property under this section shall be filed with the county recorder’s office in the county where the property is located.

(f) The public agency or nonprofit corporation to which the department transfers environmental mitigation property shall not do any of the following:

(1) Transfer or assign the property to another entity without approval from the
 department and compliance with this section.

(2) Transfer or use the property for any other purpose than required by permit conditions and mitigation requirements.

(3) Subdivide the property.

(4) Allow the property to be used to obtain development approval for other property or to provide mitigation for the development of other property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 503, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

118.8.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “State Route 710 Terminus” means the Route 710 Terminus in the City of Alhambra, north of Route 10, built and currently
 operating as State Route 710.

(2) “The State Route 710 Terminus adjacent areas” means any department-owned areas or any areas impacted by past department planning for State Route 710, within the geographic area in any jurisdiction of the County of Los Angeles bounded by North Eastern Street to the west; Huntington Drive, west of the intersection of Huntington Drive and West Main Street, and West Main Street, east of that intersection, on the north; South Fremont Avenue on the east; and Route 10 on the south, excluding the State Route 710 Terminus.

(b) (1) The department shall establish and administer a Terminus Regional Planning
 Task Force, composed of the following members:

(A) Two representatives from the City of Alhambra.

(B) Two representatives from the City of Los Angeles, one of whom resides in the 90032 Zip Code.

(C) One representative from the County of Los Angeles.

(D) One representative from the California State University, Los Angeles.

(E) One representative from the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority.

(F) One representative from a business or workforce entity.

(G) One representative from a community-based organization.

(H) No more than
 two additional members to be appointed by the department.

(2) The department shall issue a solicitation of interest throughout the community and, from respondent entities, select the business or workforce entity and the community-based organization to be represented on the task force pursuant to subparagraphs (F) and (G) of paragraph (1), respectively.

(3) Each of the entities identified in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (1) and each of the entities selected pursuant to paragraph (2) shall nominate its representative to the department. The Mayor of the City of Los Angeles and the Los Angeles City Council shall jointly nominate the representatives of the City of Los Angeles. The Alhambra City Council shall nominate the representatives of the City of Alhambra.

(4) The department, in considering the
 nominations, shall ensure jurisdictional balance on the task force.

(c) (1) The task force shall meet quarterly, incorporating robust community engagement, to discuss the issues of traffic and potential land uses, including affordable housing, student housing, workforce development space, public university expansion, parks, open space, and alternative transportation.

(2) By December 1, 2025, the task force shall complete and submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on projects and land use in the State Route 710 Terminus adjacent areas addressing the issues identified in paragraph (1), including a summary and status of the Alhambra 710 Arterial Project.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, the report required to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (2) shall not be considered a land use study.

(d) Upon completing its duties required under subdivision (c), the task force shall dissolve.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the
 task force to impede a local jurisdiction’s ability to implement projects at the State Route 710 Terminus or in State Route 710 Terminus adjacent areas.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 501, Sec. 2.   (SB 710)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

118.9.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), “Blues Beach property” means the property that meets the following description:

(i) The department acquired the property for state highway purposes.

(ii) The property is located along State Route 1 between post mile 73.65 and post mile 75.62 in the unincorporated community of Westport in the County of Mendocino.

(B) “Blues Beach property” does not include property that is
 part of the highway-operating right-of-way.

(2) “California Native American tribe” means the Sherwood Valley Band of Pomo Indians, the Round Valley Indian Tribes, or the Coyote Valley Band of Pomo Indians.

(3) “Qualified nonprofit corporation” means a nonprofit corporation that is qualified pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is organized by one or more California Native American tribes for the purpose of environmental protection, including the protection of Native American cultural resources. A qualified nonprofit corporation may include other Native American tribes besides California Native American tribes if their participation in the nonprofit is approved by a majority of the California Native American tribes organizing the nonprofit.

(b) The department may, upon terms, standards, and conditions approved by the commission, transfer the Blues Beach property at no cost to a qualified nonprofit corporation in accordance with this section.

(c) The conditions of the transfer of the Blues Beach property pursuant to subdivision (b) shall require the Blues Beach property to be maintained as a natural habitat and for protection of Native American cultural resources.

(d) As a condition to the transfer of the Blues Beach property pursuant to subdivision (b), the department may enter into an agreement with the transferee on a written plan to manage the Blues Beach property in accordance with this section.

(e) The department shall provide the fiscal and transportation
 policy committees of the Legislature with at least 30 days prior written notice of the transfer to facilitate the Legislature’s review of the transfer.

(f) (1) The qualified nonprofit corporation to which the department transfers the Blues Beach property shall assume the long-term responsibility for the future maintenance of the property.

(2) (A) If the qualified nonprofit corporation fails to maintain the Blues Beach property in the manner required by this section, or if the qualified nonprofit corporation ceases to exist, the property shall automatically revert to the department.

(B) Any costs, including legal costs, associated with reversion pursuant to this
 paragraph shall not accrue to the department.

(g) (1) All deeds conveying the Blues Beach property in accordance with this section shall include a restriction limiting the use of the property to public access, natural habitat, and the protection of Native American cultural resources.

(2) All deeds conveying the Blues Beach property in accordance with this section and deeds related to a transfer or assignment of property under this section shall be filed with the county recorder’s office in the county where the property is located and shall be consistent with Section 30609.5 of the Public Resources Code.

(h) A qualified nonprofit corporation to which the department transfers the Blues Beach property
 pursuant to this section shall not do any of the following:

(1) Transfer or assign the Blues Beach property to another entity
 without approval from the department and compliance with this section.

(2) Transfer or use the property for any other purpose than the purposes authorized in this section.

(3) Subdivide the property.

(4) Allow the property to be used to obtain development approval for other property or to provide mitigation for the development of other property.

(5) Charge monetary fees to access the property.

(6) Permit commercial or retail development on the property.

(7) Permit gaming on the property.

(i) A qualified nonprofit corporation to which the department transfers the Blues Beach property pursuant to this section shall allow public access to the Blues Beach property consistent with the requirement to provide public access, maintain natural habitat, and protect Native American cultural resources, but may restrict public access to any portion of the property that contains a Native American burial ground and shall restrict public access from sunset to sunrise. The restriction on public access from sunset to sunrise does not apply to Native American cultural activities, including, but not limited to, conducting cultural activities, harvesting native plants, and fishing.

(j) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) This section serves the public
 purpose of conserving highly vulnerable natural and cultural resources that must be preserved and protected from damage due to unauthorized activities.

(2) Due to the remoteness of the Blues Beach property and the exceptional vulnerability of the resources, it is necessary to restrict public coastal access to the hours between sunrise and sunset.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 152.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

119.

Any real property or interest therein which has passed to the State and has been accepted on behalf of the State by the department for highway purposes, inadvertently or by mistake, may be reconveyed to the persons entitled thereto. The reconveyance of any such real property or interest therein shall be executed by the director on behalf of the State. Such reconveyance shall not be made until the consideration originally received therefor by the grantor is first refunded or reconveyed to the State, or to any other party entitled thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

120.

With the consent and approval of the Public Utilities Commission, the department may abandon that portion of any state highway which crosses the tracks or right of way of any railroad or street railroad, and may close such crossing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 700.)
-------------------------------------------

121.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a state highway that has been designated by the federal government as an All-American Road on or before April 30, 2002, shall be maintained and operated by the department consistent with the recommendations for context-sensitive design standards relative to aesthetics and safety that are contained in the corridor management plan submitted to the Federal Highway Administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 530, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

122.

Whenever jurisdiction over any highway within a State park has been relinquished to the authority charged by law with the management and control of such park, the department may construct, improve or maintain such highway. Any construction, improvement or maintenance of highways, other than State highways, within state parks shall be subject to the approval of the park authority.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

123.

The provisions of section 122 shall neither affect nor limit the department’s authority, possession or control of any State highway even though any portion of such State highway is located within a State park.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

123.5.

The department shall erect and maintain signs directing the way to each of the 21 California Missions originally established by the Franciscan Fathers at the state highway intersection (or turn-offs in case of freeways) nearest to each of the missions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 999.)
-------------------------------------------

124.

The department may restrict the use of, or close, any State highway whenever the department considers such closing or restriction of use necessary:

(a) For the protection of the public.

(b) For the protection of such highway from damage during storms or during construction, improvement or maintenance operations thereon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

124.1.

(a) Upon completion by the department of a safety study and a determination by the director, with the concurrence of the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol, that truck traffic attributable to the United States-Mexico border crossing at Tecate in San Diego County constitutes a safety hazard to schoolbus operations, the department shall determine methods of mitigating the safety hazard, including, but not limited to, prohibiting the use of truck tractor-trailer combinations on Route 94 from the communities of Boulevard and Manzanita to
 the junction of Route 54 (traveling east and west) during the hours of 6 a.m. to 9 a.m. and 2 p.m. to 5 p.m. on those days that public school districts utilize that portion of Route 94 to operate schoolbuses, as defined in Section 545 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) Any person operating a vehicle on Route 94 in violation of this section is guilty of an infraction punishable as provided in Section 42001 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

125.

To notify the public that a state highway is closed or its use restricted, the department may:

(a) Erect suitable barriers or obstructions upon such highway.

(b) Post warnings and notices of the condition of any such highway.

(c) Post signs for the direction of traffic upon it, or to or upon any other highway or detour open to public travel.

(d) Place warning devices on such highway.

(e) Assign a flagman to warn, detour or direct traffic on such highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 837.)
-------------------------------------------

126.

(a) Notwithstanding the advertising and bidding provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code or Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code, the department may enter into an agreement for the purchase of environmental mitigation credits in a mitigation credit agreement, or from a mitigation bank, conservation bank, or an in-lieu fee program, or other mitigation credit provider, if a state or federal regulatory agency requires the department to purchase credits from a particular mitigation credit provider.

(b) Notwithstanding the advertising and bidding provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract